Alaska, session 34, HB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 42.05.381(e) is amended to read: 04 (e) The commission shall adopt regulations for public [ELECTRIC 05 COOPERATIVES AND FOR LOCAL EXCHANGE TELEPHONE] utilities setting a 06 range for adjustment of rates by a simplified rate filing procedure. A public 07 [COOPERATIVE OR TELEPHONE] utility may apply for permission to adjust its 08 rates over a period of time under the simplified rate filing procedure regulations. The 09 commission shall grant the application if the [COOPERATIVE OR TELEPHONE] 10 utility satisfies the requirements of the regulations. The commission may review 11 implementation of the simplified rate filing procedure at reasonable intervals and may 12 revoke permission to use the procedure or require modification of the rates to correct 13 an error. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.